Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 12 Acknowledgments and Notarial Acts

34-12-1.
Form of acknowledgment — Foreign acknowledgments.

Acknowledgment of any instrument hereafter made need not be in any set form, but shall be made by all the parties executing the instrument and the certificate thereof shall express the ideas that the parties were each and all known to the magistrate taking the acknowledgment, and known by the magistrate to be the parties executing the instrument, and that they acknowledge the instrument to be their free act and deed; provided, however, that in case of any such instrument executed without this state, and within the limits of the United States or of any dependency thereof, if the instrument is acknowledged or proved in the manner prescribed by the law of the state, District of Columbia, territory or such dependency, where executed, it shall be deemed to be legally executed, and acknowledged and shall have the same effect as if executed and acknowledged in the mode above prescribed, including an acknowledgment by less than all parties if made in a jurisdiction the laws of which permit acknowledgments in that manner; provided, however, that instruments requiring acknowledgments by parties having opposing interests must be acknowledged by at least one party of each interest.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 5; P.L. 1928, ch. 1221, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-1

; P.L. 1982, ch. 233, § 1.

34-12-2.
Officers authorized to take acknowledgments.

Acknowledgment of any instrument required by any statute of this state to be acknowledged shall be made:

Within this state, before any state senator, any state representative, judge, justice of the peace, clerk or assistant clerk of the superior court, mayor, notary public, town clerk or recorder of deeds.

Without this state and within the limits of United States or any dependency thereof, before any judge or justice of a court of record or other court, justice of the peace, mayor or notary public, of the state, District of Columbia, territory or such dependency, in which such acknowledgment is made, or before any commissioner appointed by the governor of this state, or before any officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds in the place in which the acknowledgment is made.

Without the limits of the United States, before any of the following officers acting within his territorial jurisdiction or within that of the court of which he or she is an officer:

An ambassador, envoy, minister, chargé d’affaires, secretary of legation, consul-general, consul, vice-consul, consular agent, vice-consular agent, or any other diplomatic or consular agent or representative of the United States, appointed or accredited to, and residing within the country where the acknowledgment or proof is taken.

A judge or other presiding officer of any court having a seal or the clerk or other certifying officer thereof.

A mayor or other chief civil officer of any city or other political subdivision.

A notary public.

A person residing in, or going to, the country where the acknowledgment or proof is to be taken, and specially authorized for that purpose by a commission issued to him or her under the seal of the superior court.

Any person authorized, by the laws of the country where the acknowledgment or proof is made, to take acknowledgments of conveyances of real estate or to administer oaths in proof of the execution thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 8; P.L. 1928, ch. 1221, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 1010, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-2

; P.L. 1959, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 142, § 1.

34-12-3.
Acknowledgments in good faith before person claiming to be authorized — Penalty for misrepresentation.

Any acknowledgment made in good faith before a person claiming to be one of the foregoing officials authorized to take acknowledgments within the respective jurisdictions as above, shall be valid, although the official before whom the acknowledgment is made was not duly qualified in that office; but every person who shall, within this state, wilfully take and certify to the taking of any such acknowledgment, without being lawfully qualified thereunto, shall be liable in a criminal proceeding to a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00), one-half (1/2) to the use of the complainant and the other half thereto to the use of this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-3

.

34-12-4.
Instruments executed by diplomatic officials outside United States.

Every instrument requiring acknowledgment, executed without the limits of the United States, concerning lands lying within this state, in which instrument any ambassador, minister, charge d’affaires, consul general, vice-consul general, consul, vice-consul, consular agent, commercial agent, of the United States, or commissioner appointed by the governor of this state, shall be grantor, may be executed in the presence of two (2) witnesses; and when so executed, an official certificate under the hand and official seal of the grantor that such instrument is his act and deed shall be equivalent to an acknowledgment of such instrument in the manner required by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-4

.

34-12-5.
Power of armed forces officers to take acknowledgments.

In addition to the acknowledgment of instruments and the performance of other notarial acts in the manner and form and as otherwise authorized by law, instruments may be acknowledged, documents attested, oaths and affirmations administered, depositions and affidavits executed, and other notarial acts performed, before or by any commissioned officer in active service of the armed forces of the United States with the rank of second lieutenant or higher in the army, air force, or marine corps, or with the rank of ensign or higher in the navy or coast guard, or with equivalent rank in any other component part of the armed forces of the United States, by any person without the limits of the United States, and to any person who is a member of the armed forces who is within or without the limits of the United States and their lawful dependents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1391, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-5

; P.L. 1963, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 260, § 1.

34-12-6.
Effect of acknowledgment before armed forces officer.

An acknowledgment of instruments, attestation of documents, administration of oaths and affirmations, execution of depositions and affidavits, and performance of other notarial acts, made or taken before an armed forces officer, are hereby declared legal, valid, and binding, and instruments and documents so acknowledged, authenticated, or sworn to shall be admissible in evidence and eligible to be recorded in this state under the same circumstances and with the same force and effect as if the acknowledgment, attestation, oath, affirmation, deposition, affidavit, or other notarial act had been made or taken within this state before or by a duly qualified officer or official as otherwise provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1391, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-6

.

34-12-7.
Contents of certificate of armed forces officer.

In the taking of acknowledgments and the performing of other notarial acts requiring certification, a certificate endorsed upon or attached to the instrument or documents, which shows the date of the notarial act and which states, in substance that the person appearing before the officer acknowledged the instrument as his or her act or made or signed the instrument or document under oath, shall be sufficient for all intents and purposes. The instrument or document shall not be rendered invalid by the failure to state the place of execution or acknowledgment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1391, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-7

.

34-12-8.
Proof of authority of armed forces officer.

If the signature, rank, and branch of service or subdivision thereof, of any such commissioned officer appear upon such instrument or document or certificate, no further proof of authority of the officer so to act shall be required and the action by the commissioned officer shall be prima facie evidence that the person making the oath or acknowledgment is within the purview of §§

34-12-5

—

34-12-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1391, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-8

.

34-12-9.
Validation of prior acknowledgments before foreign notary public.

Any acknowledgment taken or made prior to April 27, 1928, of or upon any instrument used in conveying, directly or indirectly, any interest in real estate in this state, including power of attorney, and any other instruments heretofore acknowledged prior to April 27, 1928, before any notary public in any foreign country or territory without the United States, which instrument appears of record to have been duly recorded in any of the records of land evidence in this state, and the acknowledgment therein appearing was taken before a notary public outside the United States, which notary public was duly commissioned in the foreign place where the acknowledgment was taken, to take the acknowledgment, and the acknowledgment is accredited, approved or affirmed, or the commission of the foreign notary public is attested or certified by any ambassador, minister, charge d’affaires, consul general, vice-consul general, consul, vice consul, or consular agent of the United States, or any commissioned officer in active service of the armed forces of the United States with the rank of second lieutenant or higher in the army, air force, or marine corps, or with the rank of ensign or higher in the navy or coast guard, or with equivalent rank in any other component of the armed forces of the United States, duly establishing the fact that the notary public was at the time of taking the acknowledgment duly authorized by the law, rules, or regulations of his or her particular country or territorial section thereof, in which the acknowledgment was taken, to duly administer oaths or take acknowledgments, then the acknowledgment and conveyance in connection with which the acknowledgment was taken shall, for the purpose of the acknowledgment and execution thereof, be deemed a valid acknowledgment, and shall have the same effect as if acknowledged before a notary public in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2132, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 437, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-12-9

; P.L. 1967, ch. 212, § 1.